California, session 20252026, SB705.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would support small businesses by establishing a certification process that streamlines the steps to opening and operating a business in California, including training and educational requirements to equip entrepreneurs with the necessary skills and knowledge to successfully run a small business in the state.